tests/phon-y.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-lookup
    Gen: ../crh.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../crh.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  "Cases (singular)":
    boyun<n><px3sp><nom> : boynu
    boyun<n><px1sg><dat> : boynuma
    boyun<n><px1pl><dat> : boynumızğa
    boyun<n><px3sp><dat> : boynuna
    boyun<n><px3sp><loc> : boynunda
    boyun<n><px3sp><acc> : boynunı
    boyun<n><attr> : boyun
    burun<n><px3sp><nom> : burnu
    burun<n><px3sp><dat> : burnuna
    burun<n><px3sp><loc> : burnunda
    burun<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : burnundaki
    burun<n><px3sp><acc> : burnunı
    burun<n><px3sp><gen> : burnunıñ
    burun<n><loc> : burunda
    burun<n><dat> : burunğa
    burun<n><pl><acc> : burunlarnı
    devir<n><loc> : devirde
    devir<n><loc><attr> : devirdeki
    devir<n><attr> : devir
    devir<n><pl><loc> : devirlerde
    devir<n><pl><abl> : devirlerden
    devir<n><pl><nom> : devirler
    devir<n><pl><dat> : devirlerge
    devir<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : devirleri
    devir<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : devirlerinde
    devir<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : devirlerini
    devir<n><acc> : devirni
    devir<n><gen> : devirniñ
    devir<n><px3sp><nom> : devri
    devir<n><px1sg><nom> : devrim
    devir<n><px3sp><loc> : devrinde
    devir<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : devrindeki
    devir<n><px3sp><abl> : devrinden
    devir<n><px3sp><dat> : devrine
    devir<n><px3sp><acc> : devrini
    devir<n><px3sp><gen> : devriniñ
    fikir<n><loc> : fikirde
    fikir<n><abl> : fikirden
    fikir<n><attr> : fikir
    fikir<n><dat> : fikirge
    fikir<n><pl><abl> : fikirlerden
    fikir<n><pl><nom> : fikirler
    fikir<n><pl><dat> : fikirlerge
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : fikirleri
    fikir<n><pl><px1sg><nom> : fikirlerim
    fikir<n><pl><px1pl><nom> : fikirlerimiz
    fikir<n><pl><px1sg><acc> : fikirlerimni
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : fikirlerinde
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : fikirlerine
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><ins> : fikirlerinen
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : fikirlerini
    fikir<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : fikirleriniñ
    fikir<n><pl><px2pl><nom> : fikirleriñiz
    fikir<n><pl><px2sg><acc> : fikirleriñni
    fikir<n><pl><ins> : fikirlernen
    fikir<n><pl><acc> : fikirlerni
    fikir<n><pl><gen> : fikirlerniñ
    fikir<n><ins> : fikirnen
    fikir<n><acc> : fikirni
    fikir<n><gen> : fikirniñ
    fikir<n><px3sp><nom> : fikri
    fikir<n><px1sg><dat> : fikrime
    fikir<n><px1sg><nom> : fikrim
    fikir<n><px1pl><nom> : fikrimiz
    fikir<n><px1pl><dat> : fikrimizge
    fikir<n><px1pl><acc> : fikrimizni
    fikir<n><px1sg><acc> : fikrimni
    fikir<n><px3sp><dat> : fikrine
    fikir<n><px3sp><acc> : fikrini
    fikir<n><px2pl><nom> : fikriñiz
    fikir<n><px2pl><dat> : fikriñizge
    nutuq<n><px3sp><loc> : nutqunda
    nutuq<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : nutuqlarında
    nutuq<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : nutuqları
    nutuq<n><pl><acc> : nutuqlarnı
    nutuq<n><pl><gen> : nutuqlarnıñ
    nutuq<n><pl><nom> : nutuqlar
    nutuq<n><loc> : nutuqta
    oğul<n><px1sg><dat> : oğluma
    oğul<n><px1sg><abl> : oğlumdan
    oğul<n><px1pl><dat> : oğlumızğa
    oğul<n><px1pl><nom> : oğlumız
    oğul<n><px1sg><ins> : oğlumnen
    oğul<n><px1sg><gen> : oğlumnıñ
    oğul<n><px1sg><acc> : oğlumnı
    oğul<n><px1sg><nom> : oğlum
    oğul<n><px3sp><dat> : oğluna
    oğul<n><px3sp><ins> : oğlunen
    oğul<n><px3sp><gen> : oğlunıñ
    oğul<n><px3sp><acc> : oğlunı
    oğul<n><px2pl><dat> : oğluñızğa
    oğul<n><px2pl><ins> : oğluñıznen
    oğul<n><px2pl><acc> : oğluñıznı
    oğul<n><px2pl><nom> : oğluñız
    oğul<n><px2sg><acc> : oğluñnı
    oğul<n><px3sp><nom> : oğlu
    oğul<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : oğullarına
    oğul<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : oğullarından
    oğul<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : oğullarında
    oğul<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : oğullarını
    oğul<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : oğulları
    oğul<n><attr> : oğul
    qısım<n><abl> : qısımdan
    qısım<n><loc> : qısımda
    qısım<n><dat> : qısımğa
    qısım<n><pl><abl> : qısımlardan
    qısım<n><pl><loc> : qısımlarda
    qısım<n><pl><dat> : qısımlarğa
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : qısımlarına
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : qısımlarından
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : qısımlarında
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><gen> : qısımlarınıñ
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : qısımlarını
    qısım<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : qısımları
    qısım<n><pl><ins> : qısımlarnen
    qısım<n><pl><gen> : qısımlarnıñ
    qısım<n><pl><acc> : qısımlarnı
    qısım<n><pl><nom> : qısımlar
    qısım<n><gen> : qısımnıñ
    qısım<n><acc> : qısımnı
    qısım<n><attr> : qısım
    qısım<n><px3sp><dat> : qısmına
    qısım<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : qısmındaki
    qısım<n><px3sp><abl> : qısmından
    qısım<n><px3sp><loc> : qısmında
    qısım<n><px3sp><gen> : qısmınıñ
    qısım<n><px3sp><acc> : qısmını
    qısım<n><px3sp><nom> : qısmı
    şekil<n><loc><attr> : şekildeki
    şekil<n><abl> : şekilden
    şekil<n><loc> : şekilde
    şekil<n><dat> : şekilge
    şekil<n><pl><loc> : şekillerde
    şekil<n><pl><dat> : şekillerge
    şekil<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : şekillerine
    şekil<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : şekillerini
    şekil<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : şekilleri
    şekil<n><pl><acc> : şekillerni
    şekil<n><acc> : şekilni
    şekil<n><attr> : şekil
    şekil<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : şeklindeki
    şekil<n><px3sp><loc> : şeklinde
    şekil<n><px3sp><dat> : şekline
    şekil<n><px3sp><acc> : şeklini
    vaqıt<n><pl><loc> : vaqıtlarda
    vaqıt<n><pl><dat> : vaqıtlarğa
    vaqıt<n><pl><px3sp><dat> : vaqıtlarına
    vaqıt<n><pl><px3sp><abl> : vaqıtlarından
    vaqıt<n><pl><px3sp><loc> : vaqıtlarında
    vaqıt<n><pl><px3sp><acc> : vaqıtlarını
    vaqıt<n><pl><px3sp><nom> : vaqıtları
    vaqıt<n><pl><gen> : vaqıtlarnıñ
    vaqıt<n><pl><acc> : vaqıtlarnı
    vaqıt<n><pl><nom> : vaqıtlar
    vaqıt<n><gen> : vaqıtnıñ
    vaqıt<n><acc> : vaqıtnı
    vaqıt<n><dat> : vaqıtqa
    vaqıt<n><loc><attr> : vaqıttaki
    vaqıt<n><abl> : vaqıttan
    vaqıt<n><loc> : vaqıtta
    vaqıt<n><attr> : vaqit
    vaqıt<n><attr> : vaqıt
    vaqıt<n><px1pl><acc> : vaqtımıznı
    vaqıt<n><px1sg><nom> : vaqtım
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><dat> : vaqtına
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><loc><attr> : vaqtındaki
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><abl> : vaqtından
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><loc> : vaqtında
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><gen> : vaqtınıñ
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><acc> : vaqtını
    vaqıt<n><px3sp><nom> : vaqtı
    nutuq<n><px3sp><acc> : nutqını
    oğul<n><px2sg><acc> : oğluñni
